nb: Bokstype: Bryst; Crossover; Skuff; Sidefeste; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de caixa: Arca; Cruzado; Gaveta; Montagem lateral; Outro
es: Tipo de caja: Arcón; Cruzado; Cajón; Montaje lateral; Otros
cs: Typ boxu: Na prsa; Crossover; Zásuvka; Boční montáž; Jiné
it: Tipo di scatola: Cassa; A incrocio; Cassetto; Montaggio laterale; Altro
ko: 박스 유형: 궤; 크로스오버; 서랍; 사이드 마운트; 기타
nl: Doostype: Borst; Gekruist; Lade; Zijmontage; Andere
tr: Kutu Tipi: Göğüs; Crossover; Çekmece; Yan montaj; Diğer
lt-LT: Dėžės tipas: Skrynia; Automobilinė įrankių dėžė; Stalčius; Tvirtinama šone; Kita
de: Fachtyp: Truhe; Überkreuzt; Schublade; Seitlich angebracht; Sonstiges
da: Kassetype: Bryst; Crossover; Skuffe; Sidemontering; Andet
bg-BG: Тип кутия: Сандък; Кросоувър; Чекмедже; Страничен монтаж; Други
ja: ボックスタイプ: チェスト; クロスオーバー; 引き出し; サイドマウント; その他
el: Τύπος κιβωτίου: Στήθος; Crossover; Συρτάρι; Πλευρικής στήριξης; Άλλο
th: ประเภทกล่อง: หน้าอก; แบบครอสโอเวอร์; ลิ้นชัก; ติดด้านข้าง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta kutije: Škrinja; Višenamjenska; Ladica; Bočni nosač; Ostalo
hu: Doboz típusa: Láda; Rekeszekre osztott; Fiókos; Oldalsó rögzítés; Egyéb
sv: Lådtyp: Bröst; Crossover; Låda; Sidomonterad; Övrigt
pl: Typ pudełka: Klatka piersiowa; Crossover; Szuflada; Mocowanie boczne; Inne
vi: Loại hộp: Tủ ngăn kéo; Bộ phân tầng loa; Ngăn kéo; Gắn kết bên; Khác
zh-CN: 箱子类型: 箱子; 交叉; 抽屉; 侧装; 其他
en: Box type: Chest; Crossover; Drawer; Side mount; Other
ru: Тип ящика: Грудь; С перемычкой; Ящик; Застежка сбоку; Другое
ro-RO: Tip cutie: Cufăr; Macaz; Sertar; Montare laterală; Altele
fi: Laatikkotyyppi: Rintakehä; Crossover; Vetolaatikko; Sivukiinnitys; Muu
zh-TW: 箱型: 櫃式; 交叉型; 抽屜; 側面安裝; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta zabojnika: Skrinja; Frekvenčno križanje; Predal; Stranski nosilec; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ boxu: Truhlica; Crossover; Zásuvka; Bočná montáž; Iné
fr: Type de boîte: Poitrine; Croisés; Tiroir; Montage latéral; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de caixa: Baú; Cruzado; Gaveta; Montagem lateral; Outro